Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2514.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3701(a) and (b)(14) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3701. Alimony.(a) General rule.--[Where] Except as provided in subsection (a.1), if a divorce decree has been entered, the court may allow alimony, as it deems reasonable, to either party only if it finds that alimony is necessary.(a.1) Exception.--The court shall deny alimony to a party if the court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the party subjected the other party to a pattern or continuous threat of abuse during the marriage.(b) Factors relevant.--In determining whether alimony is 123456789101112131415161718 necessary and in determining the nature, amount, duration and manner of payment of alimony, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including:* * *(14) The marital misconduct of either of the parties during the marriage. The marital misconduct of either of the parties from the date of final separation shall not be considered by the court in its determinations relative to alimony, except that the court shall consider the abuse of one party by the other party[. As used in this paragraph, "abuse" shall have the meaning given to it under section 6102 (relating to definitions).] in accordance with subsection (a.1).* * *(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abuse." As defined in section 6102 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2514PN3407 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920